Utah statutes.
17-23-5.   Maps for county or county officers.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), each county surveyor shall:

(a)  trace, blueprint, or otherwise make all maps necessary for the county or any county officer; and

(b)  file those maps and all data obtained by the surveyor from other sources in the surveyor's office.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply to an ownership plat that the county recorder is required under Section 17-21-21 to prepare and keep.



Amended by Chapter 241, 2001 General Session

